Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Subchapter 2. Labeling; Weights and Measures; Tests

§ 2811.
Marking of retail packages.

All retail packages of dairy products and fluid dairy products sold or offered for sale shall be plainly and conspicuously marked with:
(a) (1) All retail packages of dairy products and fluid dairy products sold or offered for sale shall be plainly and conspicuously marked with:

The true name of the product as defined by statute or regulation.

The true name of all ingredients in descending order of importance if it is not a single defined product.

The name and address of the producer or handler.

The net weight or volume of package contents.

The Secretary may assign identifying numbers for milk plants, which may appear on the package.

The following situations are exempted from the operation of subsection (a) of this section:

Milk sold by a producer to a handler.

A producer who sells unpasteurized (raw) milk pursuant to chapter 152 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 175

, § 3; amended

1969, No. 73

, § 6, eff. April 18, 1969;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2011, No. 39

, § 4, eff. May 19, 2011.

§ 2812.
False, misleading, or fraudulent statements.

No false, misleading, or fraudulent statement shall appear on a retail package, display material, or advertising connected therewith.
The words dairy, milk, cream, dairy farm, cow, and all words or pictures of similar connotation shall not be used on packages of imitation dairy products, products in semblance of dairy products, or in the display material or advertising connected therewith.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 175

, § 4.

§ 2813.
Testing utensils.

Bottles, pipettes, or measuring glasses used by a person in determining by test the value of milk or cream received from other persons, before use, may be tested for accuracy of measurement and for accuracy of the percent scale marked thereon, by the State Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets.

The Secretary may enter into reciprocal agreements with other states with regard to testing equipment or may accept tests conducted by other states having substantially the same tests.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 175

, § 9; amended

1967, No. 52

;

1989, No. 256

(Adj. Sess.), § 10(a), eff. Jan. 1, 1991;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 2814.
Tests of sample by Secretary.

The producers and handlers of milk and dairy products may request the Secretary to make bacteriological or chemical tests, or both, of their dairy products and water in the central testing laboratory of the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets. If, in the opinion of the Secretary, these tests can be made without interfering with regulatory work, the Secretary or his or her agent may perform them. A handler for whom such tests are made shall pay fees as, in the opinion of the Secretary, will cover the cost of performing the tests.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 175

, § 12; amended

1989, No. 256

(Adj. Sess.), § 10(a), eff. Jan. 1, 1991;

1999, No. 49

, § 122;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 2815.
Records and reports.

Each handler shall record and preserve for one year all purchases and sales by weight or volume, butterfat or solids tests, or any other tests that are used as a basis for payment or determination of quality for dairy products delivered by a producer. The record shall show the name and number of the producer, the period covered by the test, and the date the test was made. This record shall be signed by the licensed technician performing the tests and shall be available for examination by the Secretary at all times.

The handler shall immediately furnish each producer for each delivery a statement showing the weight or volume of dairy product, the producer’s name and number, the handler’s name, the date, and other information required by the Secretary.

Each payment to each producer shall be accompanied by a statement showing the period covered, the producer’s name and number, unit price, weight or volume for the period covered, the results of all tests used as a basis for payment, a detailed statement of all deductions, and other appropriate information.

The Secretary shall upon request make available to the persons directly involved, the results of all tests made by him or her to check the accuracy of tests performed by the milk handler.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 175

, § 13; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 2816.
Preliminary incubation testing; rejection of supply.

A handler shall not reject the milk supply of a producer based solely on a preliminary incubation count.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. July 1, 2011.